Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1920
Aggregate quality assurance assessment;
limitation.

The
aggregate quality assurance assessment shall not exceed the lower of the amount
necessary to accomplish the uses specified in section 68-1926 or the maximum
amount of gross inpatient revenue that may be assessed pursuant to the indirect
guarantee threshold as established pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68(f)(3)(i).
The aggregate quality assurance assessment shall be imposed on a per-nonmedicare-day
basis.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 20.